apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="v/pravo__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>dopraa</l><r>pravo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>pravo</l><r>pravo<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snažně__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>jc</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ji</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="teprv/e__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>a</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>á</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vždy__adv">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>necky</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ne</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="těžko__adv">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dál/e__adv">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zl__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>ejc</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>eji</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="hl/uboce__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>oub</l><r>uboce<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejoub</l><r>uboce<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>uboce</l><r>uboce<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/louho__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>éle</l><r>louho<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejéle</l><r>louho<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>louho</l><r>louho<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nelouho</l><r>louho<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tuze__adv">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="po/řád__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>rád</l><r>řád<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>řád</l><r>řád<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="čast/o__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>ěji</l><r>o<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejěji</l><r>o<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>o</l><r>o<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="odsud__adv">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>v</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="š/iroko__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>ířeji</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íře</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>íř</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejířeji</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejíře</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejíř</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iroko</l><r>iroko<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spíš/e__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>neje</l><r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nej</l><r>e<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/dobře__adv">
      <e><p>          <l>lépe</l><r>dobře<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>líp</l><r>dobře<s n="adv"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejlépe</l><r>dobře<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>nejlíp</l><r>dobře<s n="adv"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>dobře</l><r>dobře<s n="adv"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="abecedně"><i>abecedně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="alibisticky"><i>alibisticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anglicky"><i>anglicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="autenticky"><i>autenticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bezkonkurenčně"><i>bezkonkurenčně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bleskurychl"><i>bleskurychl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bystř"><i>bystř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bíl"><i>bíl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="býval"><i>býval</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cel"><i>cel</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="celoročně"><i>celoročně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chirurgicky"><i>chirurgicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chrabř"><i>chrabř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="chytř"><i>chytř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cynicky"><i>cynicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dbal"><i>dbal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="diplomaticky"><i>diplomaticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dlouho"><i>d</i><par n="d/louho__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dobře"><i></i><par n="/dobře__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dokonal"><i>dokonal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="domněl"><i>domněl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dramaticky"><i>dramaticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="drz"><i>drz</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dynamicky"><i>dynamicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dále"><i>dál</i><par n="dál/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="elektricky"><i>elektricky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="energicky"><i>energicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="eticky"><i>eticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fantasticky"><i>fantasticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="fyzicky"><i>fyzicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="geograficky"><i>geograficky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hebrejsky"><i>hebrejsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hezky"><i>hezky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hluboce"><i>hl</i><par n="hl/uboce__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hluboko"><i>hluboko</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hol"><i>hol</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hypoteticky"><i>hypoteticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="investičně"><i>investičně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jedl"><i>jedl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jednoduš"><i>jednoduš</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="každodenně"><i>každodenně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kolmo"><i>kolmo</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kontumačně"><i>kontumačně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="křesťansky"><i>křesťansky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="latinsky"><i>latinsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ledabyl"><i>ledabyl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="letmo"><i>letmo</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="manuálně"><i>manuálně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="melodicky"><i>melodicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mil"><i>mil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="minul"><i>minul</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mistrovsky"><i>mistrovsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="modř"><i>modř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="moudř"><i>moudř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mysticky"><i>mysticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nahodil"><i>nahodil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nejprve"><i>nejprv</i><par n="dál/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="neskonal"><i>neskonal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nostalgicky"><i>nostalgicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="náhl"><i>náhl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="německy"><i>německy</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="obsáhl"><i>obsáhl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="obvykl"><i>obvykl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="odjinud"><i>odjinud</i><par n="odsud__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="odněkud"><i>odněkud</i><par n="odsud__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="odsud"><i>odsud</i><par n="odsud__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ojediněl"><i>ojediněl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="okázal"><i>okázal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="opticky"><i>opticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="osaměl"><i>osaměl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ospal"><i>ospal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ostř"><i>ostř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pateticky"><i>pateticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="personálně"><i>personálně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pestř"><i>pestř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="plaš"><i>plaš</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ploš"><i>ploš</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="podezřel"><i>podezřel</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pohlavně"><i>pohlavně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="polsky"><i>polsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="posléze"><i>posléz</i><par n="dál/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pořád"><i>po</i><par n="po/řád__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prakticky"><i>prakticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="provinil"><i>provinil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="prudce"><i>prudce</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pěvecky"><i>pěvecky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="přímo"><i>přímo</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="přímočař"><i>přímočař</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="režijně"><i>režijně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rozsáhl"><i>rozsáhl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ručně"><i>ručně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rychl"><i>rychl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sebekriticky"><i>sebekriticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="skvěl"><i>skvěl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="slizce"><i>slizce</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="snažně"><i>snažně</i><par n="snažně__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="souvisl"><i>souvisl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="specificky"><i>specificky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="spíše"><i>spíš</i><par n="spíš/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="staticky"><i>staticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stroz"><i>stroz</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="stylisticky"><i>stylisticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="suš"><i>suš</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="světl"><i>světl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="sympaticky"><i>sympaticky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="technologicky"><i>technologicky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tepl"><i>tepl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="teprve"><i>teprv</i><par n="teprv/e__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tmavomodř"><i>tmavomodř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="trestně"><i>trestně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tíž"><i>tíž</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="těžko"><i>těžko</i><par n="těžko__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ustál"><i>ustál</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="uznal"><i>uznal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="velkorys"><i>velkorys</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vlastně"><i>vlastně</i><par n="snažně__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vpravo"><i>v</i><par n="v/pravo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vysokoškolsky"><i>vysokoškolsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vytrval"><i>vytrval</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vřel"><i>vřel</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vždy"><i>vždy</i><par n="vždy__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zbaběl"><i>zbaběl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zběsil"><i>zběsil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zdvořil"><i>zdvořil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zoufal"><i>zoufal</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="závisl"><i>závisl</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="územně"><i>územně</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="často"><i>čast</i><par n="čast/o__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="čil"><i>čil</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="šalamounsky"><i>šalamounsky</i><par n="tuze__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="šedomodř"><i>šedomodř</i><par n="zl__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="široko"><i>š</i><par n="š/iroko__adv"/></e>
